Louisiana, session 2026, HB64.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 205 is hereby amended and reenacted
and Code of Criminal Procedure Article 202(H) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 202. Warrant of arrest; issuance; recall
* * *
H. A magistrate may recall a warrant of arrest that he has previously issued
and shall immediately notify by written notice the office of the district attorney and
the law enforcement agency that is responsible for execution of the warrant.
* * *
Art. 205. Effective period
A warrant of arrest remains in effect until executed or recalled.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.